District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.141

Veterans Appreciation Scholarship Fund.

(a)

There is established as a nonlapsing fund the Veterans Appreciation Scholarship Fund “Fund”, which shall be used solely for the purposes set forth in subsection (c) of this section. The Fund shall be funded by appropriations.

(b)

All funds deposited into the Veterans Appreciation Scholarship Fund, and any interest earned on those funds, shall not revert to the unrestricted find balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the uses and purposes set forth in subsection (a) of this section without regard to fiscal year limitation, subject to authorization by Congress.

(c)

Subject to the availability of funds in the Fund, United States military personnel whose service began on or after September 11, 2001, and who are residents of the District of Columbia shall be granted reimbursement of tuition, fees, books, and other materials from the Fund for undergraduate and graduate courses at the University of the District of Columbia for a period of 4 years after their return from active duty.

Mar. 20, 2009, D.C. Law 17-312, § 2, 56 DCR 35
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1291 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1291 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).